Arkansas, session 2025, HB1963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-87-310(b)(2)(B)(ii), concerning the
prescriptive authority of an advanced practice registered nurse, is amended
to read as follows:
(ii)(a) The prescription is for a stimulant.
(b) A prescription for a stimulant shall meet
the following criteria:
(1) The prescription was originally
initiated by a physician;
(2) The physician has evaluated the
patient within six (6) months before the advanced practice registered nurse
issues a prescription; and
(3) The prescription by the advanced
practice registered nurse is to treat the same condition as the original
prescription.
*JMB450*
04-09-2025 18:22:42 JMB450

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1963
(c) An advanced practice registered nurse may
substitute a therapeutically equivalent medication of the drug prescribed by
the physician under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d) If the advanced practice registered nurse
substitutes a therapeutically equivalent medication under subdivision
(b)(2)(B)(ii)(c) of this section, the advanced practice registered nurse
shall notify the physician who originally prescribed the stimulant of the
substitution.

/s/Gonzales


























04-09-2025 18:22:42 JMB450